th: ประเภทของขนมปัง: บาแกตต์; บริออช; ฮาลลาห์; ชิอาบัตต้า; ดินเนอร์โรล; แฟลตเบรด; ฟอกาชา; ปราศจากกลูเตน; ขนมปังแฮมเบอร์เกอร์; ขนมปังฮอตด็อก; ขนมปังแถว; มัลติเกรน; นาน; พิต้า; เพรทเซล; ขนมปังโรล/บัน; ไรย์; ซาวร์โด; ตอร์ติญ่า; โฮลวีต; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Duonos rūšis: Prancūziškas batonas; Briošė; Chala; Čiabata; Pietų bandelė; Paplotėlis; Fokača; Be glitimo; Mėsainio bandelė; Dešrainio bandelė; Kepalas; Daugiagrūdė; Nanas; Pita; Precelis; Bandelė; Ruginė; Su raugu; Tortilija; Pilno grūdo; Kita
pt-BR: Variedade de pão: Baguete; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Pãozinho; Pão achatado; Focaccia; Sem glúten; Pão de hambúrguer; Pão de cachorro-quente; Pão de forma; Multigrãos; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Pãozinho; Centeio; Fermentação natural; Tortilha; Trigo integral; Outros
ko: 빵 종류: 바게트; 브리오슈; 할라; 치아바타; 디너 롤; 플랫브레드; 포카치아; 글루텐 프리; 햄버거 번; 핫도그 번; 로프; 잡곡; 난; 피타; 프레첼; 롤/번; 호밀; 사워도우; 토르티야; 통밀; 기타
fr: Variété de pain: Baguette; Brioche; Hallah; Ciabatta; Petit pain; Pain plat; Focaccia; Sans gluten; Pain à hamburger; Pain à hot-dog; Miche; Multigrains; Naan; Pita; Bretzel; Petit pain/pain rond; Seigle; Levain; Tortilla; Blé entier; Autre
tr: Ekmek çeşidi: Baget; Briyoş; Challah; Ciabatta; Akşam yemeği ekmeği; Yassı ekmek; Focaccia; Glutensiz; Hamburger ekmeği; Sosisli sandviç ekmeği; Somun; Çok tahıllı; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Yuvarlak sandviç ekmeği; Çavdar; Ekşi mayalı; Lavaş; Tam buğday; Diğer
da: Brødvariant: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Middagsbolle; Fladbrød; Focaccia; Glutenfri; Burgerbolle; Pølsebrød; Brød; Flerkorn; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Bolle; Rug; Surdej; Tortilla; Fuldkornshvede; Andet
ru: Сорт хлеба: Багет; Бриошь; Хала; Чиабатта; Булочка для обеда; Лепешка; Фокачча; Без глютена; Булочка для гамбургера; Булочка для хот-дога; Буханка; Мультизлаковый; Наан; Пита; Крендель; Булочка/рулет; Ржаной; На закваске; Тортилья; Цельнозерновой; Другое
it: Varietà di pane: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Panino da tavola; Pane basso (flatbread); Focaccia; Senza glutine; Panino per hamburger; Panino per hot dog; Pagnotta; Multicereali; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Panino; Segale; Pasta madre; Tortilla; Integrale; Altro
zh-CN: 面包品种: 法式长棍面包; 布里欧修面包; 哈拉面包; 恰巴塔面包; 佐餐小面包; 扁平面包; 佛卡夏面包; 无麸质面包; 汉堡胚; 热狗胚; 条形面包; 多谷物面包; 馕; 皮塔饼; 碱水面包; 小圆面包/餐包; 黑麦面包; 酸面团面包; 墨西哥薄饼; 全麦面包; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta kruha: Bageta; Brioš; Hala; Čabata; Žemljica; Ploščati kruh; Fokača; Brez glutena; Bombetka za hamburger; Štrukca za hot dog; Hlebec; Večzrnato; Naan; Pita; Presta; Žemljica / bombetka; Ržen; Z drožmi; Tortilja; Polnozrnato; Drugo
fi: Leivän lajike: Patonki; Briossi; Challah; Ciabatta; Sämpylä; Rieska; Focaccia; Gluteeniton; Hampurilaissämpylä; Hot dog -sämpylä; Vuokaleipä; Monivilja; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Sämpylä/pulla; Ruis; Hapanjuuri; Tortilla; Täysjyvävehnä; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de pâine: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Chiflă; Lipie; Focaccia; Fără gluten; Chiflă pentru hamburger; Chiflă pentru hot dog; Franzelă; Multicereale; Naan; Pita; Covrig; Chiflă; Secară; Maia; Tortilla; Grâu integral; Altele
zh-TW: 麵包種類: 法國長棍麵包; 布里歐; 猶太辮子麵包; 拖鞋麵包; 餐包; 扁麵包; 佛卡夏; 無麩質; 漢堡包; 熱狗堡; 整條麵包; 雜糧; 饢餅; 皮塔餅; 蝴蝶餅; 餐包/小圓麵包; 黑麥麵包; 酸種麵包; 墨西哥薄餅; 全麥; 其他
cs: Druh chleba: Bageta; Brioška; Chala; Ciabatta; Pečivo k jídlu; Plochý chléb; Focaccia; Bezlepkový; Bulka na hamburger; Rohlík na párek v rohlíku; Bochník; Vícezrnný; Naan; Pita; Preclík; Rohlík/bulka; Žitný; Kváskový; Tortilla; Celozrnný pšeničný; Jiné
nb: Brødvariant: Baguett; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Rundstykke; Flatbrød; Focaccia; Glutenfri; Hamburgerbrød; Pølsebrød; Brød; Flerkorn; Nan; Pita; Saltkringle; Rundstykke/bolle; Rug; Surdeig; Tortilla; Fullkornshvete; Annet
el: Ποικιλία ψωμιού: Μπαγκέτα; Μπριός; Τσαλά; Τσιαπάτα; Ψωμάκι για φαγητό; Επίπεδο ψωμί; Φοκάτσια; Χωρίς γλουτένη; Ψωμάκι για χάμπουργκερ; Ψωμάκι για χοτ ντογκ; Καρβέλι; Πολύσπορο; Ναν; Πίτα; Πρέτσελ; Ψωμάκι/ρολό; Σίκαλη; Προζύμι; Τορτίγια; Σιτάρι ολικής άλεσης; Άλλο
sv: Brödsort: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Bordsbröd; Tunnbröd; Focaccia; Glutenfritt; Hamburgerbröd; Korvbröd; Limpa; Flerkornsbröd; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Fralla/bulle; Rågbröd; Surdeg; Tortilla; Fullkornsvete; Övrigt
bg-BG: Разновидности хляб: Багета; Бриош; Хала; Чабата; Хлебче; Плосък хляб; Фокача; Без глутен; Питка за хамбургер; Питки за хотдог; Самун; Многозърнест; Наан; Пита; Претцел; Ролче/питка; Ръжен; С квас; Тортила; Пълнозърнест; Друго
ja: パンの種類: バゲット; ブリオッシュ; ハッラー; チャバタ; ディナーロール; フラットブレッド; フォカッチャ; グルテンフリー; ハンバーガーバンズ; ホットドッグバンズ; 食パン (ローフ); マルチグレイン; ナン; ピタパン; プレッツェル; ロール/バンズ; ライ麦; サワードウ; トルティーヤ; 全粒粉; その他
pt-PT: Variedade de pão: Baguete; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Pãozinho; Pão achatado; Focaccia; Sem glúten; Pão de hambúrguer; Pão de cachorro-quente; Pão de forma; Multicereais; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Pãozinho/bola; Centeio; Massa mãe; Tortilha; Trigo integral; Outro
nl: Broodsoort: Stokbrood; Brioche; Challe; Ciabatta; Zacht bolletje; Platbrood; Focaccia; Glutenvrij; Hamburgerbroodje; Hotdogbroodje; Brood; Meergranen; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Broodje/bolletje; Rogge; Zuurdesem; Tortilla; Volkoren; Overig
pl: Różnorodność pieczywa: Bagietka; Brioszka; Chałka; Ciabatta; Bułeczka obiadowa; Płaski chleb / Podpłomyk; Focaccia; Bezglutenowy; Bułka do hamburgerów; Bułka do hot dogów; Bochenek; Wieloziarnisty; Naan; Pita; Precel; Bułka; Żytni; Na zakwasie; Tortilla; Razowy; Inne
de: Auswahl an Brot: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Partybrötchen; Fladenbrot; Focaccia; Glutenfrei; Hamburger-Brötchen; Hot-Dog-Brötchen; Laib; Mehrkorn; Naan; Pita; Brezel; Brötchen; Roggen; Sauerteig; Tortilla; Vollkornweizen; Sonstiges
vi: Loại bánh mì: Bánh mì Baguette; Bánh mì Brioche; Bánh mì Challah; Bánh mì Ciabatta; Bánh mì tròn; Bánh mì dẹt; Bánh mì Focaccia; Không chứa gluten; Vỏ bánh hamburger; Vỏ bánh hot dog; Bánh mì ổ; Đa ngũ cốc; Bánh mì Naan; Bánh mì Pita; Bánh Pretzel; Bánh mì cuộn/bánh mì tròn; Lúa mạch đen; Bánh mì men chua; Bánh Tortilla; Lúa mì nguyên cám; Khác
es: Variedad de pan: Baguette; Brioche; Jalá; Chapata; Panecillo; Pan plano; Focaccia; Sin gluten; Pan para hamburguesa; Pan para hot dog; Hogaza; Multigrano; Naan; Pan pita; Pretzel; Bollo/panecillo; Centeno; Masa madre; Tortilla; Trigo integral; Otro
en: Bread variety: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Dinner roll; Flatbread; Focaccia; Gluten-free; Hamburger bun; Hot dog bun; Loaf; Multigrain; Naan; Pita; Pretzel; Roll/Bun; Rye; Sourdough; Tortilla; Whole wheat; Other
sk-SK: Druh chleba: Bageta; Brioška; Chala; Ciabatta; Rožok; Placka; Focaccia; Bezlepkový; Hamburgerová žemľa; Rožok na hotdog; Bochník; Viaczrnný; Naan; Pita; Praclík; Rožok/žemľa; Ražný; Kváskový; Tortila; Celozrnný pšeničný; Iné
hu: Kenyér fajtája: Bagett; Brióss; Barhesz; Ciabatta; Zsemle; Lepénykenyér; Focaccia; Gluténmentes; Hamburgerzsemle; Hot dog kifli; Cipó; Többmagvas; Naan; Pita; Perec; Zsemle/kifli; Rozs; Kovászos; Tortilla; Teljes kiőrlésű; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta kruha: Baguette; Brioche; Challah; Ciabatta; Pecivo; Pogača; Focaccia; Bez glutena; Pecivo za hamburger; Pecivo za hrenovke; Štruca; Više žitarica; Naan; Pita kruh; Perec; Pecivo; Raženi kruh; Kruh od kiselog tijesta; Tortilja; Cjelovita pšenica; Ostalo